lexc-files/postural_roots.txt
!===================
LEXICON PosturalRoot
!===================

aaghw                    PosturalRootTag; ! upside down
agagh:aga%{g%}h          PosturalRootTag; ! hanging
agitagh:agita%{g%}h      PosturalRootTag; ! open-mouthed
agugh:agu%{g%}h          PosturalRootTag; ! bending; turning
amsikagh*:amsikagh       PosturalRootTag; ! undressed; naked
asigh:asi%{g%}h          PosturalRootTag; ! tied in a bundle
avlegh                   PosturalRootTag; ! with legs spread; with parts which are joined at one end spread apart at the other end
enleg                    PosturalRootTag; ! attached or fastened to something secure
estugh:estu%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! with legs stretched out
guugh                    PosturalRootTag; ! bent forward with head downward
iggag                    PosturalRootTag; ! tilting
ighigh:ighi%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! tilting (especially the head)
ikigh:iki%{g%}h          PosturalRootTag; ! open
ingagh*:ingagh           PosturalRootTag; ! lying down
iqrag                    PosturalRootTag; ! uneven; distorted
kagtagh:kagta%{g%}h      PosturalRootTag; ! concealed; secluded
kallngugh:kallngu%{g%}h  PosturalRootTag; ! assembled; gathered
kiimllug                 PosturalRootTag; ! dim
matagh*:matagh           PosturalRootTag; ! undressed; parka-less; coatless
matangghagh*:matangghagh PosturalRootTag;
mayagh:maya%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! being or becoming thin
mumig                    PosturalRootTag; ! turned over; translated
naghllug                 PosturalRootTag; ! head downwards
nakugh:naku%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! eyes crossed
nanugh:nanu%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! hanging lengthwise
napagh:napa%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! erect; upright
neghllugh:neghllu%{g%}h  PosturalRootTag; ! head first
nekeg                    PosturalRootTag; ! put in place; having a good home; quieted down 
nevagh:neva%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! lying on the back
nevegh                   PosturalRootTag; ! lying on the back
qanimigh:qanimi%{g%}h    PosturalRootTag; ! finished; worked on towardcompletion
qavigh:qavi%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! slanted; diagonal
qetegh                   PosturalRootTag; ! bending backwards
qunagh:quna%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! eyes closed
qunegh                   PosturalRootTag; ! eyes closed
qutngugh:qutngu%{g%}h    PosturalRootTag; ! bending over forward with head down while in a sitting position
sanigh:sani%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! sideways
saqfigh:saqfi%{g%}h      PosturalRootTag; ! toes out turned out
segesqugh:segesgqu%{g%}h PosturalRootTag; ! kneeling
sivug                    PosturalRootTag; ! head tilted up
suflitagh:suflita%{g%}h  PosturalRootTag; ! lying on stomach
supag                    PosturalRootTag; ! tilted; slanted; leaning; at an angle
suqlugh:suqlu%{g%}h      PosturalRootTag; ! crumpled; folded in to narow an opening; bent
taklagh:takla%{g%}h      PosturalRootTag; ! spread out; stretched out
teghleg                  PosturalRootTag; ! fastened securely over something
tutugh:tutu%{g%}h        PosturalRootTag; ! folded over with a crease
ulmig                    PosturalRootTag; ! turned over; inside out
ulpeg                    PosturalRootTag; ! folded back on self

!--------------------------------------------
! verb bases that behave like postural roots 
!--------------------------------------------
aqumga                   PosturalRootTag; ! to be sitting
aqumgagh*:aqumgagh       PosturalRootTag;
nekevgha                 PosturalRootTag; ! to be standing
nekevghagh*:nekevghagh   PosturalRootTag;

!----------------------------------------------
! postbases associated with postural roots may
! be used with some verb roots [Badten p.648]
!----------------------------------------------
atkug(V):atkug           PosturalRootPostbase; ! to put on a parka
aveg(V):aveg             PosturalRootPostbase; ! to divide in two
kepe(V):kepe             PosturalRootPostbase; ! to sever
liite(V):liite           PosturalRootPostbase; ! to learn
nasaperagh(V):nasaperagh PosturalRootPostbase; ! to put on a hat
piifte(V):piif%{t%}e     PosturalRootPostbase; ! to set out for use
piiste(V):piis%{t%}e     PosturalRootPostbase; ! to stick out; to project
qiwaagh(V):qiwaagh       PosturalRootPostbase; ! to shear fur short


!======================
LEXICON PosturalRootTag
!======================

(POS):0            PosturalRootPostbase;
(POS→QUANTQUAL):0  QuantQualInfl;


!===========================
LEXICON PosturalRootPostbase
!===========================

^~fnga(POS→STATIVE):^%{.f.%}nga  VerbPostbaseI;  ! to be in the R posture
^~fnga(POS→STATIVE):^%{.f.%}nga  QuantQualInfl;  ! to be in the R posture
^+te(POS→ACTIVE):^%{t%}e         VerbPostbaseII; ! to get into the R posture; to put into the R posture
^+te(POS→ACTIVE):^%{t%}e         QuantQualInfl;  ! to get into the R posture; to put into the R posture
